Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 175A County Turnpike Authority [Repealed]

175A.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

175A.020.
Legislative Intent. [Repealed.]

175A.030.
Turnpike Authority — Counties may establish. [Repealed.]

175A.040.
Turnpike Authority — Membership — Meetings — Quorum — Corporate character. [Repealed.]

175A.050.
Authority may undertake turnpike projects. [Repealed.]

175A.060.
General powers of authority as to turnpike projects. [Repealed.]

175A.070.
Policing of projects. [Repealed.]

175A.080.
Grade separations — Relocation or vacation of existing highways — Rights of access — Regulations as to public utility facilities on or along turnpike projects. [Repealed.]

175A.090.
Turnpike revenue bonds of the authority. [Repealed.]

175A.100.
Revenue bonds are not debt of Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof. [Repealed.]

175A.110.
Tolls for use of turnpike — Disposition of toll revenues. [Repealed.]

175A.120.
Trust indenture to secure bonds — Rights and remedies of bondholders. [Repealed.]

175A.130.
Trust Funds. [Repealed.]

175A.140.
Remedies of bondholders. [Repealed.]

175A.150.
Turnpike properties and bonds are tax-exempt. [Repealed.]

175A.160.
Status of turnpike bonds as investments. [Repealed.]

175A.170.
Restoration of private property — Donation of property by county or city — Annual report of turnpike activities — Audits — Prohibition of interest of bureau of highways as authority personnel. [Repealed.]

175A.180.
Acquisition of property — Condemnation — Possession — Special provisions for condemning railroad property. [Repealed.]

175A.190.
Refunding bonds, issued when — Temporary investments. [Repealed.]

175A.200.
Transfer of turnpike to highway system after retirement of bonds. [Repealed.]

175A.210.
Preliminary expenses of turnpike projects — Leases between authority and bureau authorized — Hazards caused by weather — Bureau to alleviate. [Repealed.]

175A.220.
Additional and alternative nature of chapter. [Repealed.]

175A.990.
Penalty. [Repealed.]